Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1521
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-1521 to 44-1535 shall be known and may be cited as the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act.

Laws 1991, LB 234, § 3;

Laws 2008, LB855, § 6.